src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON OTH-ODDCASE
          +Sg+Gen:a       K     ;
          +Sg+Acc:av      K     ;
          +Sg+Ill:ij      K     ; ! Px ?? !!
          +Sg+Ine:in      K     ;
          +Sg+Ela:is      K     ;
          +Sg+Com:ijn     K     ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Com:ijna    K     ; !
          +Pl+Nom:a       K     ;
          +Pl+Gen:ij      K     ;
          +Pl+Acc:ijt     K     ;
          +Pl+Ill:ijda    K     ;
          +Pl+Ine:ijn     K     ;
          +Pl+Ela:ijs     K     ;
          +Pl+Com:ij      K     ;
          +Sg+Nom:        NPxC  ;
          +Sg+Gen:        NPxC  ; !
          +Sg+Acc:        NPxC  ; !
          +Sg+Ill:as%>    NPxCs ; !
          +Sg+Ine:in%>    NPxCs ; !
          +Sg+Ela:ist%>   NPxCs ; !
          +Sg+Com:ijn%>   NPxCs ; !
          +Pl+Gen:ij%>    NPxCs ; !
          +Pl+Acc:ijd%>   NPxCs ; !
          +Pl+Ill:ijdas%> NPxC  ; !
          +Pl+Ine:ijn%>   NPxCs ; !
          +Pl+Ela:ijst%>  NPxCs ; !
          +Pl+Com:ij%>    NPxCs ; !
             +Ess:in      K     ;
          +Sg+Abe:a#dagi  K     ;
          +Sg+Abe:a#dagá  K     ;
 +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:a#tagá  K     ;
          +Pl+Abe:ij#dagi K     ;
          +Pl+Abe:ij#dagá K     ;
 +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:ij#tagá K     ;


LEXICON OTH-ODDCASEadj
        +Sg+Nom+Err/Orth:        PxC  ; !
                 +Sg+Gen:a       K    ;
                 +Sg+Acc:av      K    ;
                 +Sg+Ill:ij      K    ; ! Px ?? !!
                 +Sg+Ine:in      K    ;
                 +Sg+Ela:is      K    ;
                 +Sg+Com:ijn     K    ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Com:ijna    K    ; !
                 +Pl+Nom:a       K    ;
                 +Pl+Gen:ij      K    ;
                 +Pl+Acc:ijt     K    ;
                 +Pl+Ill:ijda    K    ;
                 +Pl+Ine:ijn     K    ;
                 +Pl+Ela:ijs     K    ;
                 +Pl+Com:ij      K    ;
                    +Ess:in      K    ;
                 +Sg+Abe:a#dagi  K    ;
                 +Sg+Abe:a#dagá  K    ;
        +Err/Orth+Sg+Abe:a#tagá  K    ;
                 +Pl+Abe:ij#dagi K    ;
                 +Pl+Abe:ij#dagá K    ;
        +Err/Orth+Pl+Abe:ij#tagá K    ;
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Sg+Gen:        PxC  ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Sg+Acc:        PxC  ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Sg+Ill:as%>    PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Sg+Ine:in%>    PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Sg+Ela:ist%>   PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Sg+Com:ijn%>   PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Pl+Gen:ij%>    PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Pl+Acc:ijd%>   PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Pl+Ill:ijdas%> PxC  ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Pl+Ine:ijn%>   PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Pl+Ela:ijst%>  PxCs ; !
 +Use/SpellNoSugg+Pl+Com:ij%>    PxCs ; !

LEXICON BENA-NE
                +Sg+Nom:                 K                 ; ! bena
                +Sg+Nom:                 NPxV-12           ; ! !benas, in Tuolja-book.
  +Sg+Nom@R.Nom3Px.add@:00@R.Nom3Px.add@ NPxV3             ;
             +Cmp/SgNom:                 R                 ;
                   +Ess:n                K                 ;

!LEXICON BENA-OBL
!               +Sg+Nom:00               PxC               ; !^P^
!               +Sg+Gen:a                K                 ;
!               +Sg+Abe:a#dagi           K                 ;
!               +Sg+Abe:a#dagá           K                 ;
!               +Sg+Abe:a#tagá           K                 ;
!               +Sg+Gen:                 PxC               ; !^P^
!               +Sg+Acc:a                K                 ;
!               +Sg+Acc:                 K                 ;
!               +Sg+Acc:                 PxC               ; !^P^
!               +Pl+Nom:at               K                 ;
!               +Sg+Ill:asa%>            PxV               ; !^P^
!                      :i                MALLASI-/NUORABU- ;
!                      :i                MALLASI-          ;

LEXICON AHTÁ
          +Abe:ahtá K ;
          +Abe:ahti K ;
 +Err/Orth+Abe:ahtu K ;


!! !!Contracted stems
! ----------------

LEXICON SUOLOJ !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg II-III: ålmåj:ålmmå
  +N:%>Q3 ÅLMÅJ-NE            ; ! III-I CG
  +N:%>X4 CONTR-OTH           ;
  +N:»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
  +N:»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;
! +N:X5   CONTR-OTH           ; ! o:u as well!

!!€gt-norm: njurgoj # Contracted test
!!€ njurgoj:            njurgoj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ njurgguv:          njurgoj+N+Sg+Acc


LEXICON ÅLMÅJ_LOAN !!= @CODE@ Same as SUOLOJ, only for loan words. Follows Ráhka/Mikkelsen's Bårjås 2014. C-final with cg II-III: ålmåj:ålmmå
  		   +N:%>Q3 ÅLMÅJ-NE            ; ! III-I CG
 		   +N:%>X4 CONTR-OTH           ;
 		   +N:»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
  		   +N:»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;
  +Err/Orth+N:   MUORRAInfl ;
  +Err/Orth+N:%> MUORRACmp  ;
! +N:X5   CONTR-OTH           ; ! o:u as well!

!!€gt-norm: bistroj # Contracted test
!!€ bistroj:            bistroj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ bisstruv:          bistroj+N+Sg+Acc


LEXICON GUOMOJ !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg I-III: guomoj:guobbmu
           +N:»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
           +N:»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;
           +N:%>X6 ÅLMÅJ-NE            ; ! III-I CG
           +N:%>X5 ILL-EVENCASE        ;
           +N:%>X4 N-EVENWEAKSTEM      ;
    +N+Sg+Nom:%>   PxV                 ;
       +N+Ess:%>n  K                   ;
 +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>   R                   ;
 +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>j  R                   ;

!!€gt-norm: ænoj # Contracted test
!!€ ænoj:            ænoj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ æddnuv:          ænoj+N+Sg+Acc
!!€ änoj:            ænoj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ äddnuv:          ænoj+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON SARVES !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg II-III. sarves:sarvvá
 +N:%>Q1 SARVES-NE           ;
 +N:%>X4 CONTR-OTH           ;
 +N:»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
 +N:»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: moarmes # Contracted test
!!€ moarmes:            moarmes+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ moarmmáv:          moarmes+N+Sg+Acc


LEXICON SVÁLES !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg I-III. sváles:svállá (lºl)
           +N:»X4   DenominalNounsCONTR ;
           +N:»X4   DenominalAdjsContr  ;
           +N:%>X6  SARVES-NE           ; ! III-I CG
           +N:%>X4  ILL-EVENCASE        ;
           +N:%>X4  N-EVENWEAKSTEM      ;
    +N+Sg+Nom:%>    PxV                 ; !
       +N+Ess:%>X4n K                   ;
 +N+Cmp/SgGen:%>    R                   ;
 +N+Cmp/PlGen:%>j   R                   ;

!!€gt-norm: sváles # Contracted test
!!€ sváles:           sváles+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sválláv:          sváles+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON GÅHKES !!= @CODE@ C-final with cg II-III with vowel harmony (a/á=å). gåhkes:gåhkkå. Presently only for "gåhkes".
 +N:e%>  SARVES-NE           ;
 +N:kå%> CONTR-OTH           ;
 +N:kå»  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
 +N:kå»  DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: gåhkes # Contracted test
!!€ gåhkes:            gåhkes+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gåhkkåv:           gåhkes+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON SJUOKKAJ !!= @CODE@ sjuokkaj:sjuoggá. Presently only for "sjuokkaj".
 +N:a%>Q3 ÅLMÅJ-NE            ;
 +N:á%>X4 CONTR-OTH           ;
 +N:á»X4  DenominalNounsCONTR ;
 +N:á»X4  DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: sjuokkaj # Contracted test
!!€ sjuokkaj:            sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ sjuoggáv:          sjuokkaj+N+Sg+Acc

LEXICON GISTÁ !!= @CODE@ gistá:gisstá. Presently only for "gistá".
     +N+Sg+Nom:%>Q1  K                   ;
!    +N+Sg+Nom:%>Q1  PxC                 ; !^P^ !Moved to CONTR-OTH
        +N+Ess:%>Q1n K                   ;
  +N+Cmp/SgNom:%>Q1  R                   ;
            +N:%>X4  CONTR-OTH           ;
            +N:»X4   DenominalNounsCONTR ;
            +N:»X4   DenominalAdjsContr  ;

!!€gt-norm: gistá # Contracted test
!!€ gistá:            gistá+N+Sg+Nom
!!€ gisstáv:          gistá+N+Sg+Acc

!! ! Contracted stems sublexica
! --------


LEXICON SARVES-NE
     +Sg+Nom:s   K   ;
!    +Sg+Nom:s%> PxC ; !^P^ !Moved to CONTR-OTH
        +Ess:n   K   ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:s   R   ;


LEXICON ÅLMÅJ-NE
     +Sg+Nom:j   K   ;
!    +Sg+Nom:j%> PxC ; !^P^ !Moved to CONTR-OTH
 +Ess+Use/NG:n   K   ;
  +Cmp/SgNom:j   R   ;
