src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounPxKin
moarssesasses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:moarssesasºse SARVES ;
LEXICON NounPx
barggemiedaviepses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:bargge#mieda#vieppse SARVES ;
barggålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:bargg#ålmmå SUOLOJ ;
bieles+CmpNP/Last+Sem/Plc:bielºle SVÁLES ;
biestarástes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:biesta#rásste SARVES ;
boatsoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:boahttsu GUOMOJ ; ! 
bruhtoj+Sem/Money:bruhttu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
bádnesváles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:bádne#sválºle SVÁLES ;
báhkogárges+Sem/Txt:báhko#gárgge SARVES ;
bálgesbieles+Sem/Plc:bálges#bielºle SVÁLES ;
bálggátsiekkes+Sem/Dummytag:bálggá#tsiegge SARVES ;
doarroålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:doarro#ålmmå SUOLOJ ;
dynámoj+Sem/Obj-el:dynábmu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
dábmaboatsoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:dábma#boahttsu GUOMOJ ;
dáhtoj+Sem/Dummytag:dáhttu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
gasskaålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gasska#ålmmå SUOLOJ ; ! 
gistá+Sem/Clth:gisstá GISTÁ ;
goabdes+Sem/Dummytag:goabdde SARVES ;
guládallamålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:guládallam#ålmmå SUOLOJ ;
guokkoj+Sem/Body:guoggu SUOLOJ ;
guolmoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Wthr:guolmmu SUOLOJ ;
guomoj+Sem/Substnc:guobbmu GUOMOJ ;
guosmoj+Sem/Dummytag:guossmu SUOLOJ ;
guovsoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Time_Wthr:guoksu SUOLOJ ;
gálles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:gálºle SARVES ; ! 
gåhkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gåhk GÅHKES ;
gånågisráppes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gånågis#rábbe SARVES ; ! 
gæhttjoboatsoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:gæhttjo#boahttsu GUOMOJ ;
huvsikålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:huvsik#ålmmå SUOLOJ ;
hárjjesváles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:hárjje#sválºle SVÁLES ;
hævtoj+Sem/Amount:hæktu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! 
inkásoj+Err/Orth+Sem/Txt:inkásºsu GUOMOJ ;
irkes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:irkke SARVES ;
kakávoj+Sem/Drink:kakávvu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
kakávoj+Err/Orth+v2+Sem/Drink:kakávºvu GUOMOJ ;
kánoj+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:kánºnu GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
kánoj+Sem/Dummytag:káddnu GUOMOJ ; !
kåntåj+Sem/Plc-abstr:kånntå ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
libjes+Sem/Dummytag:libjje SARVES ;
luorkoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/DefPlGen+Sem/Dummytag:luorkku SUOLOJ ;
miedaviepses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:mieda#vieppse SARVES ;
njunnjenjuorges+Sem/Body:njunnje#njuorgge SARVES ;
piánoj+Sem/Tool-music:pi^ánnu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! 
piánoj+Err/Orth+Sem/Tool-music:pi^ánºnu GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN 
poasstasjijroj+Err/Orth+Sem/Txt:poassta#girºru GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
poasstasjijroj+Sem/Txt:poassta#sjijrru ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
pårnåj+Sem/Dummytag:pårnnå ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
ruoppsisjuolgtjoavtjoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:ruoppsis#juolg#tjoaktju SUOLOJ ;
rástes+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:rásste SARVES ; ! 
sjijroj+Err/Orth+Sem/Txt:girºru GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
sjijroj+Sem/Txt:sjijrru ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ;
sjuokkaj+Sem/Body:sjuogg SJUOKKAJ ; ! Part on the reindeer body
skuoggasváles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:skuogga#sválºle SVÁLES ;
skádasasuoloj+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+Sem/Plc:skádasa#suolºlu GUOMOJ ; ! Proper noun only or also?
snjurgoj+v1+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:snjurggu SUOLOJ ;
sopránoj+Sem/Dummytag:soprádnu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! 
suoloj+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Plc:suolºlu GUOMOJ ; ! 
sváles+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:sválºle SVÁLES ; ! 
sváles+Err/Orth+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:sválle SARVES ; ! 
sádjoålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:sádjo#ålmmå SUOLOJ ;
sáldoj+Sem/Money:sálldu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! LOAN
tjieloj+Area/NO+Sem/Tool-music:tjiellu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! LOAN
tjieloj+Err/Orth+Sem/Tool-music:tjelºlu GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
tjijnoj+Sem/Dummytag:tjijnnu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! 
tjijnoj+Err/Orth+Sem/Dummytag:tjivnnu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! 
tjuolgoj+Sem/Dummytag:tjuolggu SUOLOJ ;
tæmpoj+Sem/Dummytag:tæmmpu ÅLMÅJ_LOAN ; ! NOR tempo
vahtatjoavtjoj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Ani:vahta#tjoaktju SUOLOJ ;
viepses+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Dummytag:vieppse SARVES ;
violijnnatjieloj+Err/Orth+Sem/Tool-music:vi^olijnna#tjelºlu GUOMOJ ; ! LOAN
ámmátålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ámmát#ålmmå SUOLOJ ;
ålmåj+CmpN/SgN+CmpN/SgG+CmpN/PlG+Sem/Hum:ålmmå SUOLOJ ; ! 
